New York, session 2025-2026, A4113.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as "Nina's Law". 2 § 2. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new section 3 1106 to read as follows: 4 § 1106. Funeral motorcades and funeral service vehicles. For the 5 purposes of this title: 6 (a) a person may disregard an official traffic-control device govern- 7 ing the number of occupants required to be in a vehicle for such vehicle 8 to be in the designated lane when such person is operating a vehicle as 9 part of a funeral motorcade going to or returning from a house of 10 worship, funeral home, crematorium, or cemetery. 11 (b) a person may disregard an official traffic-control device govern- 12 ing the number of occupants required to be in a vehicle for such vehicle 13 to be in the designated lane when such person is operating a funeral 14 service vehicle in such person's capacity as an agent of a house of 15 worship, funeral home, crematorium, or cemetery. 16 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08117-01-5